Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,146
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 15.